Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201669-313
Uniform Credentialing Act; applicability; department; powers; civil penalty; Attorney General; powers.

(1) The Uniform Credentialing Act shall apply to any person alleged or believed to have violated the Consumer Protection in Eye Care Act. The department shall investigate potential violations of the Consumer Protection in Eye Care Act according to the procedures of the Uniform Credentialing Act and shall take appropriate action as provided by the Uniform Credentialing Act.

(2) In addition to the remedies, penalties, or relief available under the Uniform Credentialing Act, the department may impose a civil penalty against a person who does not hold a credential under the Uniform Credentialing Act who has violated or attempted to violate the Consumer Protection in Eye Care Act. The civil penalty shall not exceed ten thousand dollars for each violation, up to the maximum provided in section 38-198. If the department finds that a violation or attempted violation occurred and did not result in significant harm to human health, the department may issue a warning instead of imposing a civil penalty. Any civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section may be collected as provided in section 38-198.

(3) At the request of the department, the Attorney General may file a civil action seeking an injunction or other appropriate relief to enforce the Consumer Protection in Eye Care Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the Consumer Protection in Eye Care Act.

Laws 2016, LB235, § 6.
July 21, 2016
Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.